West Virginia, session 2026, HB5017.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS’ ASSISTANCE. §9A-1-11b. American Legion Post Support Grant Program; one-time appropriation; distribution; reporting; sunset. (a) Legislative findings. – The Legislature finds that American Legion posts across the state provide essential services to veterans, military families, and local communities; that many posts face structural, financial, and operational challenges: and that a one-time statewide distribution of financial support is an appropriate public purpose to ensure these institutions remain capable of serving West Virginia's veterans.(b) Establishment of program. – There is hereby created within the Department of Veterans Assistance the American Legion Post Support Grant Program, to be administered by the Secretary of Veterans Assistance.(c) Authorization and appropriation.(1) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature through the annual budget bill or supplementary appropriation, the sum of $10 million is authorized for a one-time disbursement to active American Legion posts located within the State of West Virginia.(2) No matching funds or application from individual posts shall be required for disbursement.(d) Eligible recipients. - For purposes of this section. an "active American Legion post" means any chartered post of the American Legion that:(1) Maintains good standing with the American Legion Department of West Virginia:(2) Is operational and providing veteran-related services within the state as of January 1 of the fiscal year in which the appropriation is made.(e) Distribution formula.(1) The Department shall divide the total appropriated amount equally among all active American Legion posts identified under subsection (d).(2) The Department shall obtain an updated roster of eligible posts from the American Legion Department of West Virginia prior to distribution.(3) Funds shall be issued directly to each eligible post within 60 days of appropriation becoming effective.(f) Permitted uses. - Grant funds may be used for:(1) Building maintenance, renovation, repair or construction;(2) Equipment, vehicles, or capital improvements;(3) Utility costs, insurance, furnishings, or technology upgrades:(4) Programmatic support benefiting veterans and their families:(5) Any other lawful purpose that advances the mission of the American Legion in West Virginia.(g) Restrictions. – Funds may not be used for:(1) Direct political activity:(2) Personal compensation unrelated to post operations:(3) Any purpose prohibited by state or federal law.(h) Reporting.(1) Within twelve months of receiving funds, each post shall submit a brief expenditure report to the Department certifying the use of funds.(2) The Department shall compile a statewide summary report and submit it to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance no later than ninety days following the receipt of all post reports.(i) Rulemaking. - The Secretary of Veterans Assistance may propose procedural rules for legislative approval pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement this section.(k) Sunset. – The authority granted under this section expires upon completion of the one-time distribution and submission of the statewide report, unless otherwise reauthorized by the Legislature.